Utah statutes.
57-10-1.   Plane coordinate systems designated -- Zones within the systems by county.

(1)  The systems of plane coordinates that have been established by the National Ocean Service/National Geodetic Survey (formerly the United States Coast and Geodetic Survey) or its successors for defining and stating the geographic positions or locations of points on the surface of the earth within the state of Utah are known and designated as the Utah Coordinate System of 1927 and the Utah Coordinate System of 1983.

(2)  For the purpose of the use of these systems, the state is divided into three zones: North, Central, and South Zones.

(a)  The area now included in the following counties constitutes the North Zone: Box Elder, Cache, Daggett, Davis, Morgan, Rich, Summit, and Weber.

(b)  The area now included in the following counties constitutes the Central Zone: Carbon, Duchesne, Emery, Grand, Juab, Millard, Salt Lake, Sanpete, Sevier, Tooele, Uintah, Utah, and Wasatch.

(c)  The area now included in the following counties constitutes the South Zone: Beaver, Garfield, Iron, Kane, Piute, San Juan, Washington, and Wayne.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 60, 1988 General Session

